src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!LEXICON IV_MEAQTTTED !!= * @CODE@ meäʹtted:meätˈt
!+IV: V0_MEAQTTTED ;
!LEXICON TV_MEAQTTTED !!= * @CODE@ meäʹtted:meätˈt
!+TV: V0_MEAQTTTED ;
LEXICON V0_MEAQTTTED !!= * @CODE@ meäʹtted:meätˈt
!!! inflection_type="1"
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: meäʹtted
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meätt
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: meäʹtˈte
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mieʹtˈte
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: mieʹtt
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: mieʹttež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: meätˈtas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: miâtˈtu
!    Pass.PrfPrc
! meäʹtted:meätˈt
:^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !! (1) +V+Inf: meäʹtˈted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!!
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meätˈt
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!!
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^PAL%>e K ; !! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: meäʹtˈte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!!
:^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mieʹtˈte
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!!
:^PALẸ^PAL^CCC2CC VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2:?? miẹʹtt
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!!
:^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL^CCC2CC%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: ??mieʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!!
:^CCC2CC%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: meättas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!!
:^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: miâtˈtu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!!
: VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ +V+Imprt+Pl3 meätˈtaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

:^PAL^CCC2CCAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !! CHECK FORM

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !! (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: mieʹtˈti
!! (12)
:^VOWRaise^CCC2CC VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: 

LEXICON V_MAQHSSED !!= * @CODE@ mäʹhssed:mä^1VOWhss
: V0_MAQHSSED ;
LEXICON IV_MAQHSSED !!= * @CODE@ mäʹhssed:mä^1VOWhss
+IV: V0_MAQHSSED ;
LEXICON TV_MAQHSSED !!= * @CODE@ mäʹhssed:mä^1VOWhss
+TV: V0_MAQHSSED ;
LEXICON V0_MAQHSSED !!= * @CODE@ mäʹhssed:mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! V1HC2_E
! FORMS

:^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !! (1) +V+Inf: mäʹhssed
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!!
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mähss
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!!
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^PAL%>e K ; !! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mäʹhsse
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!!
:^VOWRaise^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: maʹhsse
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!!
:^V2VV^PAL^YXX2VX VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: määuʹs
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!!
:^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2VX%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: maauʹsež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!!
:^V2VV^YXX2VX%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: määusas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!!
:^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: mahssu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!!
: VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ (9) +V+Imprt+Pl3 mähssaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) mäuʹs
:^PAL^YXX2VX FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!!  (11) Present Participle:
:^VOWRaise^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !! (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: maʹhssi
!! (12)
:^V2VV^VOWRaise^YXX2VX VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: 

!! DERIVED VERBS WITH PENULTIMATE VOWEL LOSS AND CHANGE

!! ### CLASS 2 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION
LEXICON V_AALGXTED !!= * @CODE@  aalǥted:aalǥât
: V0_AALGXTED ;
LEXICON IV_AALGXTED !!= * @CODE@  aalǥted:aalǥât
+IV: V0_AALGXTED ;
LEXICON TV_AALGXTED !!= * @CODE@  aalǥted:aalǥât
+TV: V0_AALGXTED ;
LEXICON V0_AALGXTED !!= * @CODE@  aalǥted:aalǥât
!!! inflection_type="3"
!! gradation: no
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! aalǥat
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! aalǥât
:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;		 ! aalǥted

LEXICON V_KULSTED !!= * @CODE@ kulsted:kuulâst
: V0_KULSTED ;
LEXICON IV_KULSTED !!= * @CODE@ kulsted:kuulâst
+IV: V0_KULSTED ;
!LEXICON TV_KULSTED !!= * @CODE@ kulsted:kuulâst
!+TV: V0_KULSTED ;
LEXICON V0_KULSTED !!= * @CODE@ kulsted:kuulâst
!!! inflection_type="3"

:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! kuulâst
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! kuulâst
:^Pen^VV2V^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! kulsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! kuulsted

LEXICON V_OQNNSTED !!= * @CODE@ oʹnnsted:oʹnnest
: V0_OQNNSTED ;
!LEXICON IV_OQNNSTED !!= * @CODE@  oʹnnsted:oʹnnest
!+IV: V0_OQNNSTED ;
!LEXICON TV_OQNNSTED !!= * @CODE@ oʹnnsted:oʹnnest
!+TV: V0_OQNNSTED ;
LEXICON V0_OQNNSTED !!= * @CODE@ oʹnnsted:oʹnnest
!!! inflection_type="3"

:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! oʹnnest
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! oʹnnest
:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! oʹnnsted


LEXICON V_AGSTED !!= * @CODE@ agsted:aaggâst
: V0_AGSTED ;
LEXICON IV_AGSTED !!= * @CODE@ agsted:aaggâst
+IV: V0_AGSTED ;
!LEXICON TV_AGSTED !!= * @CODE@ agsted:aaggâst
!+TV: V0_AGSTED ;
LEXICON V0_AGSTED !!= * @CODE@ agsted:aaggâst
!!! inflection_type="3"

:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! aaggâst
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! aaggâst
:^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! agsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! aaggsted


LEXICON V_MAINSTED !!= * @CODE@ mainsted:maainâst
: V0_MAINSTED ;
LEXICON IV_MAINSTED !!= * @CODE@ mainsted:maainâst
+IV: V0_MAINSTED ;
LEXICON TV_MAINSTED !!= * @CODE@ mainsted:maainâst
+TV: V0_MAINSTED ;
LEXICON V0_MAINSTED !!= * @CODE@ mainsted:maainâst
!!! inflection_type="3"
! inf: sted
! Ind.Prs.Sg3: -â-
! foot: 2syll
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: yes
! consonant_type: geminate-single
! gradation: yes3
! weak_grade: single
! strong_grade: geminate
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' 
! mainsted:mainâst
! * Yaml: __V-mainsted__
:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! maainast
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! maainâst
:^Pen^VV2V^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! mainsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! maainsted


+Actio:^RmVow%>am K ; ! 2015-05-07 Is this necessary

LEXICON V_NUOLSTED !!= * @CODE@ nuõlsted:nuõllâst
: V0_NUOLSTED ;
!LEXICON IV_NUOLSTED !!= * @CODE@ nuõlsted:nuõllâst
+IV: V0_NUOLSTED ;
!LEXICON TV_NUOLSTED !!= * @CODE@ nuõlsted:nuõllâst
!+TV: V0_NUOLSTED ;
LEXICON V0_NUOLSTED !!= * @CODE@ nuõlsted:nuõllâst
!!! inflection_type="3"
:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! nuõllâst
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! nuõllâst
:^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! nuõlsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! nuõllsted

LEXICON V_CHIOPSTED !!= * @CODE@ čiõpsted:čiõppâst
: V0_CHIOPSTED ;
LEXICON IV_CHIOPSTED !!= * @CODE@ čiõpsted:čiõppâst
+IV: V0_CHIOPSTED ;
!LEXICON TV_CHIOPSTED !!= * @CODE@ čiõpsted:čiõppâst
!+TV: V0_CHIOPSTED ;
LEXICON V0_CHIOPSTED !!= * @CODE@ čiõpsted:čiõppâst
!!! inflection_type="3"
!!! VWC2_Y_ST
:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! čiõppâst
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! čiõppâst
:^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! čiõpsted
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! čiõppsted

LEXICON V_TAARBSHED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
: V0_TAARBSHED ;
!LEXICON IV_TAARBSHED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
!+IV: V0_TAARBSHED ;
!LEXICON TV_TAARBSHED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
!+TV: V0_TAARBSHED ;
LEXICON V0_TAARBSHED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
!!! inflection_type="3"
!!! C_Y_CV
! No Gradation
! similar_to: V_KAEIGGSHED
! š:ž
:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;	! taarbaš
:^VC VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        	! taarbâž
:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;                  ! taarbš_ed

LEXICON V_1Â_VVCCLED
: V0_KHIORGGNED ;
LEXICON V_KHIORGGNED
: V0_KHIORGGNED ;
LEXICON IV_KHIORGGNED
+IV: V0_KHIORGGNED ;
LEXICON TV_KHIORGGNED
+TV: V0_KHIORGGNED ;
LEXICON V0_KHIORGGNED
!!! inflection_type="3"
!!! C_Y_C
! Gradation: none
! ǩiõrggned:ǩiõrggân
! (ij ǩiõrggân) ^RmVow
! ǩiõrggned:ǩiõrggân
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: ǩiõrggned
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ǩiõrggan
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ǩiõrggne
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ǩiõrggne
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: ǩiõrggân
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: ǩiõrggnež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ǩiõrggnââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: ǩiõrggnuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc
:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! ǩiõrggan
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! ǩiõrggân
:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! ǩiõrggned



!! ### CLASS 2 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION
LEXICON V_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
: V0_VUEJTED ;
!LEXICON IV_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
!+IV: V0_VUEJTED ;
!LEXICON TV_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
!+TV: V0_VUEJTED ;
!+V+TV+Der+Der/oottyd+V+IV:^RmVow»õõtt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
LEXICON V0_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
!!! inflection_type="3"
!!! VWC_A_C
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' 
! FORMS
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuejat
:^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3  ;  !2 vuejat

! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2:  vuejat
!   V.Imprt.2.ConNeg, V.Ind.Prs.ConNeg
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;

! (1) +V+Inf: vuejted
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuejte
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuejte
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: vuejtež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: vuejtââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: vuejtuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc

!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
:^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^PALNo K ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^PALNo	K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:^PALNo		K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:^PALNo 	K ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE
 VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL ;
  VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-NOPAL ;
LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE-PAL
+Inf:%>ed K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>ep  K  ; 
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>eʹped K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>e     K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>et K ; !

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>em             K  ; ! vuejtem
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>iǩ             K  ; ! vuejtiǩ
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-extra-q:%>iʹǩ             K  ; ! vuejtiǩ
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>ik             K  ; ! vuejtiǩ
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i              K  ; ! ! vuejti
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>im             K  ; ! ! vuejtim
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>in      K  ; ! vuejtin
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>iim      K  ; ! vuejtiim
+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>iin      K  ; ! vuejtiin
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>id             K  ; ! ! vuejtid
+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>iid      K  ; ! vuejtiid
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>e              K  ; ! vuejte
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>eš K ; ! vuejteš
+Imprt+Pl2:%>eʹǩed           K  ;
:%>eʹ		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg:%>eʹč^Br CONDITIONAL ; ! This expects forms like: taarbšeʹččiǩ in norm yamls 2023-02-05
+Pot+Sg3:%>ež	K ; !WG
+Actio+Ess:%>eʹmmen K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg+Actio+Ess:%>eʹmen K ;
+Actio:%>em K ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAct+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>em N_AANAR ; ! XXX Actio
+Der+Der/NomAct+Der+Der/nalla+Adv:%>em»nalla K ; ! XXX Actio
+Act+PrsPrc:%>eei K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Act+PrsPrc:%>eeʹjj K ;
!+Act+PrsPrc+Der+Der/N:%>ee N_PRSPRC-EEI ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>ee N_PRSPRC-EEI ;
:e VABESS ;
 GER_ ;
+Der+Der/InchL+V:%>e»škuä{ʹØ}tt V_SHKUEAQTTED ;
